Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4423.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 from the funds indicated in this part. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,666,900 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,666,900 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,666,900 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,666,900 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,666,900 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,666,900 (2) ?MICHIGAN VETERANS AFFAIRS AGENCY County veteran service grants $ 3,666,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,666,900 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 3,666,900 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2024-2025 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $3,666,900.00 and state spending from state sources under part 1 to be paid to local units of government is $3,666,900.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS County veteran service grants $ 3,666,900 TOTAL $ 3,666,900 Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for county veteran service grants must be allocated by the department to counties that experienced a reduction in the amount of grant funding they received due to reallocation of grant funding by the department. Funds appropriated must be allocated in a manner that will hold counties harmless from loss of grant funding. (2) Funding appropriated in part 1 for county veteran service grants must be used to fund local veteran service operations, including, but not limited to, advocacy, programming, and assistance for veterans, servicemembers, dependents, and survivors. (3) Unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for county veteran service grants are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds must not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and must be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to hold harmless counties that experienced a reduction in the amount of grant funding they received. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracting with vendors, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $3,666,900.00. (d) The estimated completion date is December 31, 2025.